apertium-kas.kas.dix
    <!-- -arun verbs -->
    <pardef n="k/arun__v">
        <!-- Non-finite forms -->
        <e><p><l>arun</l>   <r>arun<s n="vblex"/><s n="inf"/>                           </r></p></e>
        <e><p><l>ormut</l>  <r>arun<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/><s n="m"/>                  </r></p></e>
        <e><p><l>ármúts</l> <r>arun<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/><s n="f"/>                  </r></p></e>
        <e><p><l>arân</l>   <r>arun<s n="vblex"/><s n="impf"/>                          </r></p></e>
        <e><p><l>árith</l>  <r>arun<s n="vblex"/><s n="conj"/>              </r></p></e>
        <e><p><l>arnai</l>  <r>arun<s n="vblex"/><s n="conj"/><s n="neg"/>                         </r></p></e>

        <!-- Future -->
        <e><p><l>arú</l>    <r>arun<s n="vblex"/><s n="fut"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/>     </r></p></e>
        <e><p><l>arakh</l>  <r>arun<s n="vblex"/><s n="fut"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/>     </r></p></e>
        <e><p><l>ari</l>    <r>arun<s n="vblex"/><s n="fut"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/>     </r></p></e>
        <e><p><l>arav</l>   <r>arun<s n="vblex"/><s n="fut"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/>     </r></p></e>
        <e><p><l>áriv</l>   <r>arun<s n="vblex"/><s n="fut"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/>     </r></p></e>
        <e><p><l>aran</l>   <r>arun<s n="vblex"/><s n="fut"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/>     </r></p></e>

        <!-- Past
        <e><p><l>or</l>    <r>arun<s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/><s n="m"/></r></p></e>
        <e><p><l>árь</l>    <r>arun<s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/><s n="m"/></r></p></e>
        <e><p><l>ár</l>    <r>arun<s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/><s n="f"/></r></p></e>
        <e><p><l>ari</l>    <r>arun<s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/><s n="f"/></r></p></e>
        <e><p><l>oruth</l> <r>arun<s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/><s n="m"/></r></p></e>
        <e><p><l>árith</l> <r>arun<s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/><s n="m"/></r></p></e>
        <e><p><l>árúth</l> <r>arun<s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/><s n="f"/></r></p></e>
        <e><p><l>árúth</l> <r>arun<s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/><s n="f"/></r></p></e>
        <e><p><l>or</l>    <r>arun<s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/><s n="m"/></r></p></e>
        <e><p><l>ár</l>    <r>arun<s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/><s n="f"/></r></p></e>
        <e><p><l>or</l>    <r>arun<s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/><s n="m"/></r></p></e>
        <e><p><l>ár</l>    <r>arun<s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/><s n="f"/></r></p></e>
        <e><p><l>oruv</l>  <r>arun<s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/><s n="m"/></r></p></e>
        <e><p><l>áruv</l>  <r>arun<s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/><s n="f"/></r></p></e>
        <e><p><l>or</l>    <r>arun<s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/><s n="m"/></r></p></e>
        <e><p><l>ár</l>    <r>arun<s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/><s n="f"/></r></p></e>
        -->
    </pardef>

	<pardef n="kor/mut__vblex">
        <e><p><l>mut</l><r>un<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/><s n="m"/></r></p></e>
	</pardef>

	<pardef n="kár/muts__vblex">
        <e><p><l>múts</l><r>un<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/><s n="f"/></r></p></e>
	</pardef>

	<pardef n="kar/un__vblex">
        <e><p><l>un</l><r>un<s n="vblex"/><s n="inf"/></r></p></e>
	</pardef>


	<!-- SECTION: Mutations -->

	<pardef n="k/arun__mutation">
	<!-- Mutation: ar -> ár,or -->
        <e><p><l>ar</l><r>ar</r></p><par n="kar/un__vblex"/></e>
        <e><p><l>ár</l><r>ar</r></p><par n="kár/muts__vblex"/></e>
        <e><p><l>or</l><r>ar</r></p><par n="kor/mut__vblex"/></e>
	</pardef>

  </pardefs>

    <e lm="parun"><i>p</i><par n="k/arun__v"/></e>
    <e lm="pharun"><i>ph</i><par n="k/arun__v"/></e>
    <e lm="karun"><i>k</i><par n="k/arun__mutation"/></e>
    <e lm="kharun"><i>kh</i><par n="k/arun__v"/></e>
    <e lm="garun"><i>g</i><par n="k/arun__v"/></e>
    <e lm="tarun"><i>t</i><par n="k/arun__v"/></e>
